test/src/morphology/V-kaotama59_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `kaotama: # Verb (59) `kaotama 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     `kaotama+V+Inf/mA: `kaotama
     `kaotama+V+Inf: `kaotaq
     `kaotama+V+ActPrtPrc: `kaotanuq
     `kaotama+V+PssPrtPrc: `kaotõt
     `kaotama+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: `kaoda
     `kaotama+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: `kaotas
     `kaotama+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: `kaodi
     `kaotama+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: kaoç
